Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-1863] Research experiences for
teachers program; established. (a) There is established within the University
of Hawaii the research experiences for teachers program, which shall be
administered by the University of Hawaii college of engineering. The purpose
of the research experiences for teachers program shall be to support the
development of middle school teacher skills and knowledge, and the development
of middle school curriculum materials in science, technology, engineering, and
mathematics subject areas, with a focus on wireless communications.

(b) The research experiences for teachers
program shall:

(1) Educate teachers in the advances in technology in
wireless communications and engineering;

(2) Enhance teacher research skills through the use
of software and innovative uses of equipment;

(3) Provide teacher participants with hands-on
research experiences;

(4) Support teachers in developing classroom lessons
and program activities that meet their course objectives and student performance
standards; and

(5) Provide opportunities to share and collaborate
with other teacher participants to ensure successful implementation of
curricula and programs.

(c) Specific activities of the research
experiences for teachers program shall include:

(1) Providing on-site lectures, demonstrations, and
laboratory tours at the University of Hawaii and middle schools;

(2) Reviewing wireless communications concepts,
methods, history, and applications;

(3) Reviewing engineering and relevant science concepts,
research methodology, and real-world applications;

(4) Reviewing key components of inquiry-based
teaching materials;

(5) Providing teachers with technical content
support;

(6) Assisting teachers in adapting state-of-the-art
engineering research into a meaningful classroom experience for students;

(7) Providing seminars to transfer relevant
information and experiences among teacher participants and sponsors;

(8) Providing summer engineering workshop for
teachers; and

(9) Maintaining a website for content and program
dissemination. [L 2007, c 111, pt of §11]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next